Utah statutes.
24-4-112.   Limitation on fees for holding seized property.

In any civil or criminal proceeding under this chapter in which a judgment is entered in favor of a claimant, or where a forfeiture proceeding against a claimant is voluntarily dismissed by the prosecuting attorney, the seizing agency may not charge that claimant any fee or cost for holding seized property.



Enacted by Chapter 394, 2013 General Session

